Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2946
Patron and investor member interests.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, member interests shall be patron member interests.

(2) The articles of organization or bylaws may establish investor member interests.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 46.